Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-610
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means the ready availability of a collaborating licensed practitioner for consultation and direction of the activities of the certified nurse midwife related to delegated medical functions as outlined in the practice agreement.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1751;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 222.